Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-152] Frauds against the government.
Any person subject to this chapter:

(1) Who, knowing it to be false or fraudulent:

(A) Makes any claim against the United
States, the State, or any officer thereof; or

(B) Presents to any person in the civil or
military service thereof, for approval or payment any claim against the United
States, the State, or any officer thereof;

(2) Who, for the purpose of obtaining the approval,
allowance, or payment of any claim against the United States, the State, or any
officer thereof:

(A) Makes or uses any writing or other paper
knowing it to contain any false or fraudulent statements;

(B) Makes any oath to any fact or to any
writing or other paper knowing the oath to be false; or

(C) Forges or counterfeits any signature upon
any writing or other paper, or uses any such signature knowing it to be forged
or counterfeited;

(3) Who, having charge, possession, custody, or
control of any money, or other property of the United States or the State,
furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the state
military forces, knowingly delivers to any person having authority to receive
it, any amount thereof less than that for which the person receives a
certificate or receipt; or

(4) Who, being authorized to make or deliver any
paper certifying the receipt of any property of the United States or the State,
furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the state
military forces, makes or delivers to any person such writing without having
full knowledge of the truth of the statements therein contained and with intent
to defraud the United States or the State;

shall, upon conviction, be punished as a
court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next